dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- राम्रोसंग; राम्रोसंग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राम्रोसंग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टक्क; टक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोझै; सोझै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोझै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झपक्क; झपक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झपक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अलमल; अलमल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अलमल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चन्द्रमाभन्दा; चन्द्रमाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चन्द्रमाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उस्ताउस्तै; उस्ताउस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उस्ताउस्तै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खपाखप; खपाखप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खपाखप__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वहुतै; वहुतै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वहुतै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- करिव; करिव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="करिव__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिनीहरूभन्दा; यिनीहरूभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिनीहरूभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन्दिरभन्दा; मन्दिरभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन्दिरभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निश्चय; निश्चय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निश्चय__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- करिब; करिब; 1 -->
    <pardef n="करिब__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कलकल; कलकल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कलकल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लुगलुग; लुगलुग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लुगलुग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सालभर; सालभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सालभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तदनुकूल; तदनुकूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तदनुकूल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जेसुकै; जेसुकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जेसुकै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हतपत्ती; हतपत्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हतपत्ती__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फनक्क; फनक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फनक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्तरोत्तर; उत्तरोत्तर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्तरोत्तर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसप्रकार; यसप्रकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसप्रकार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसप्रकार; यसप्रकार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसप्रकार__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बजेतिर; बजेतिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बजेतिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निम्नानुसार; निम्नानुसार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निम्नानुसार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुत्नुभन्दा; सुत्नुभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुत्नुभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसैकारण; त्यसैकारण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसैकारण__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उँभो; उँभो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उँभो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सर्वविदितै; सर्वविदितै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सर्वविदितै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिहानीपख; बिहानीपख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिहानीपख__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जमिनमुनि; जमिनमुनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जमिनमुनि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जीवनभर; जीवनभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जीवनभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भएभर; भएभर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भएभर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रकारेण; प्रकारेण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रकारेण__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रदर्शनभन्दा; प्रदर्शनभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रदर्शनभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारपार; वारपार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारपार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छेउछाउ; छेउछाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छेउछाउ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छुट्टाछुट्टै; छुट्टाछुट्टै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छुट्टाछुट्टै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सर्वत्र; सर्वत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सर्वत्र__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यतिसारो; यतिसारो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यतिसारो__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यतिञ्जेल; यतिञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यतिञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ट्वास्स; ट्वास्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ट्वास्स__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विषयवस्तुअनुरूप; विषयवस्तुअनुरूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विषयवस्तुअनुरूप__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="राम्रोसंग"><i>राम्रोसंग</i><par n="राम्रोसंग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="टक्क"><i>टक्क</i><par n="टक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सोझै"><i>सोझै</i><par n="सोझै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झपक्क"><i>झपक्क</i><par n="झपक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलमल"><i>अलमल</i><par n="अलमल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="चन्द्रमाभन्दा"><i>चन्द्रमाभन्दा</i><par n="चन्द्रमाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उस्ताउस्तै"><i>उस्ताउस्तै</i><par n="उस्ताउस्तै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="खपाखप"><i>खपाखप</i><par n="खपाखप__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वहुतै"><i>वहुतै</i><par n="वहुतै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="करिव"><i>करिव</i><par n="करिव__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यिनीहरूभन्दा"><i>यिनीहरूभन्दा</i><par n="यिनीहरूभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मन्दिरभन्दा"><i>मन्दिरभन्दा</i><par n="मन्दिरभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निश्चय"><i>निश्चय</i><par n="निश्चय__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="करिब"><i>करिब</i><par n="करिब__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कलकल"><i>कलकल</i><par n="कलकल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लुगलुग"><i>लुगलुग</i><par n="लुगलुग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सालभर"><i>सालभर</i><par n="सालभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तदनुकूल"><i>तदनुकूल</i><par n="तदनुकूल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जेसुकै"><i>जेसुकै</i><par n="जेसुकै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हतपत्ती"><i>हतपत्ती</i><par n="हतपत्ती__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फनक्क"><i>फनक्क</i><par n="फनक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तरोत्तर"><i>उत्तरोत्तर</i><par n="उत्तरोत्तर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसप्रकार"><i>यसप्रकार</i><par n="यसप्रकार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसप्रकार"><i>यसप्रकार</i><par n="यसप्रकार__"/></e>
    <e lm="बजेतिर"><i>बजेतिर</i><par n="बजेतिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="निम्नानुसार"><i>निम्नानुसार</i><par n="निम्नानुसार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सुत्नुभन्दा"><i>सुत्नुभन्दा</i><par n="सुत्नुभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसैकारण"><i>त्यसैकारण</i><par n="त्यसैकारण__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उँभो"><i>उँभो</i><par n="उँभो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वविदितै"><i>सर्वविदितै</i><par n="सर्वविदितै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बिहानीपख"><i>बिहानीपख</i><par n="बिहानीपख__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जमिनमुनि"><i>जमिनमुनि</i><par n="जमिनमुनि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जीवनभर"><i>जीवनभर</i><par n="जीवनभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भएभर"><i>भएभर</i><par n="भएभर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकारेण"><i>प्रकारेण</i><par n="प्रकारेण__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रदर्शनभन्दा"><i>प्रदर्शनभन्दा</i><par n="प्रदर्शनभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वारपार"><i>वारपार</i><par n="वारपार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छेउछाउ"><i>छेउछाउ</i><par n="छेउछाउ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छुट्टाछुट्टै"><i>छुट्टाछुट्टै</i><par n="छुट्टाछुट्टै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्वत्र"><i>सर्वत्र</i><par n="सर्वत्र__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यतिसारो"><i>यतिसारो</i><par n="यतिसारो__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यतिञ्जेल"><i>यतिञ्जेल</i><par n="यतिञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ट्वास्स"><i>ट्वास्स</i><par n="ट्वास्स__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विषयवस्तुअनुरूप"><i>विषयवस्तुअनुरूप</i><par n="विषयवस्तुअनुरूप__adv"/></e>
